Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 9. Hazing

§ 140a.
Redesignated. 2013, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. Feb. 14, 2014. [Repealed]

§ 140b.
Redesignated. 2013, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 140c.
Redesignated. 2013, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 140d.
Redesignated. 2013, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.